Wisconsin, session 2025, SB732.
do enact as follows:SB732,11Section 1. 442.025 (4) (a) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB732,3,52442.025 (4) (a) 2. The person holds a valid certified public accountant 3certificate or license from another state that the National Association of State 4Boards of Accountancy National Qualification Appraisal Service has verified to be 5in substantial equivalence with the certified public accountant licensure 6requirements of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants/ National 7Association of State Boards of Accountancy Uniform Accountancy Act, or the person 8obtains verification from the National Association of State Boards of Accountancy 9National Qualification Appraisal Service that his or her individual qualifications 10are substantially equivalent to the certified public accountant licensure 11requirements of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants/ National 12Association of State Boards of Accountancy Uniform Accountancy Act and has met 13requirements similar to those under s. 442.04 (5) (b). A person whose principal 1place of business or residence is not in this state and who holds a valid certified 2public accountant certificate or license from another state, as of the day before the 3effective date of this subdivision .... [LRB inserts date], and as of that date, had 4practice privileges in this state under s. 442.025 (4), 2023 stats., shall continue to 5have all the privileges of licensees in this state without the need to obtain a license.SB732,26Section 2. 442.03 of the statutes is amended to read:SB732,3,127442.03 Licenses required. No person may lawfully practice in this state as 8a certified public accountant either in the person’s own name, or under an assumed 9name, or as a member of a firm, unless the person has been granted by the 10examining board a certificate as a certified public accountant, and unless the 11person and or firm have has complied with all of the provisions of this chapter, 12including licensure.SB732,313Section 3. 442.04 (5) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 442.001 (4m) and 14amended to read:SB732,3,1715442.001 (4m) In this subsection, “institution” “Institution” means an 16institution of higher education accredited by an accrediting agency that is 17recognized by the secretary of the federal department of education.SB732,418Section 4. 442.04 (5) (b) 3. of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:SB732,3,2019442.04 (5) (b) 3. The person has, except as provided in sub. (6), satisfied one of 20the following:SB732,3,2421a. Received a master’s degree from an institution, for which the person 22completed course work in accounting and business subjects, as determined by the 23examining board, and completed not less than one year of work experience or its 24equivalent that satisfies sub. (5m).SB732,4,41b. Received a bachelor’s degree from an institution, completed at least 150 2semester hours of education that included course work in accounting and business 3subjects, as determined by the examining board, and completed not less than one 4year of work experience or its equivalent that satisfies sub. (5m).SB732,4,85c. Received a bachelor’s degree from an institution, for which the person 6completed course work in accounting and business subjects, as determined by the 7examining board, and completed not less than 2 years of work experience or its 8equivalent that satisfies sub. (5m).SB732,59Section 5. 442.04 (5) (b) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:SB732,4,1610442.04 (5) (b) 4. Except as provided in s. 442.05, the person has successfully 11passed an examination in such subjects affecting accountancy and business as the 12examining board considers necessary. A person is not eligible to take the 13examination under this subdivision unless the person has completed at least 120 14semester hours of education at or received a bachelor’s degree from an institution 15that include. In either case, the person must also have completed course work in 16accounting and business subjects, as determined by the examining board.SB732,617Section 6. 442.04 (5) (b) 5. of the statutes is repealed.SB732,718Section 7. 442.04 (5m) of the statutes is created to read:SB732,5,219442.04 (5m) (a) The work experience or equivalent of that experience that is 20required under sub. (5) (b) 3. a., b., or c. must include providing one or more types of 21service or advice representing the skills needed at the time of initial licensure to 22serve the public and must involve the use of accounting, attest, compilation, 23management advisory, financial advisory, tax or consulting skills, all of which must 1be verified. The work experience described in this paragraph may be obtained 2through employment in government, industry, academia, or public practice.SB732,5,43(b) The examining board shall judge the sufficiency of the work experience 4required under sub. (5) (b) 3. a., b., or c.SB732,85Section 8. 442.04 (6) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB732,5,76442.04 (6) (b) Apply training and service described in par. (a) to satisfy a 7portion of the 150 semester education hours required under sub. (5) (b) 3. b.SB732,98Section 9. Accy 2.002 (2) of the administrative code is amended to read:SB732,5,119Accy 2.002 (2) “Bachelor’s degree” means a baccalaureate degree normally 10conferred by universities and colleges at the completion of at least a 4-year, full-11time, academic-year program of study a university or college.SB732,1012Section 10. Accy 2.101 (3) of the administrative code is amended to read:SB732,5,1513Accy 2.101 (3) Evidence of at least one year of public accounting meeting the 14work experience as required by requirement under s. Accy 2.403 and s. 442.04 (5) 15(b) 5. 3. a., b., or c., Stats., whichever is applicable with respect to the candidate.SB732,1116Section 11. Accy 2.202 (intro.) of the administrative code is amended to read:SB732,5,2117Accy 2.202 (intro.) A candidate applying for a certificate to practice as a 18certified public accountant must have earned a bachelor’s or higher degree from an 19accredited educational institution and have satisfied one of the following for 20purposes of meeting the 150-hour coursework requirement under s. 442.04 (5) (b) 3., 21Stats.:SB732,1222Section 12. Accy 2.202 (2) (e) of the administrative code is repealed.SB732,1323Section 13. Accy 2.202 (3) (a) 5. of the administrative code is repealed.SB732,1424Section 14. Accy 2.202 (3) (b) 5. of the administrative code is repealed.SB732,151Section 15. Accy 2.303 (intro.) of the administrative code is amended to read:SB732,6,52Accy 2.303 (intro.) Education required for examination. A candidate for 3the certified public accountant examination must have satisfied one of the following 4for purposes of meeting the 120-hour coursework requirement under s. 442.04 (5) 5(b) 4., Stats.:SB732,166Section 16. Accy 2.304 (3) of the administrative code is amended to read:SB732,6,97Accy 2.304 (3) A candidate must pass all sections of the uniform certified 8public accountant examination within a rolling 30-month period that begins on the 9date of notification the candidate is notified that the first section is passed.SB732,1710Section 17. Accy 2.401 (1) of the administrative code is amended to read:SB732,6,2111Accy 2.401 (1) Following the successful passing of each section of the uniform 12CPA examination and upon written request by a candidate, a candidate’s 13experience shall be reviewed by the board. The written request shall include 14employer verification statements and information on experience to update the 15experience data already in the candidate’s file. Such evaluation will determine 16whether the candidate qualifies at that time under the requirement of having at 17least one year of public accounting the requisite work experience or its equivalent 18under s. Accy 2.403, the sufficiency of the experience or the equivalency to be 19judged by the board. The board shall inform the candidate if additional experience 20is needed. Upon gaining the required additional experience, the candidate shall 21notify the board and provide verification.SB732,1822Section 18. Accy 2.402 (1) and (2) (a) to (c) of the administrative code are 23amended to read:SB732,7,324Accy 2.402 (1) The board shall evaluate public accounting work experience 1and equivalent experience at each regularly scheduled board meeting, in accordance 2with s. 442.04 (5m), Stats. Evaluations may be made at special meetings, but 3normally will not be scheduled at such meetings.SB732,7,64(2) (a) Experience in accounting in industry and government may be 5considered equivalent to public accounting when it requires high levels of 6knowledge, competence and judgment.SB732,7,107(b) Experience in teaching accounting may be considered equivalent to public 8accounting when it is at an advanced and specialized level of accounting. Courses 9taught in areas other than accounting do not qualify as public accounting 10experience.SB732,7,1311(c) Experience in law may be considered equivalent to public accounting when 12it is at a level with responsibility for independent accounting decisions and requires 13high levels of accounting knowledge, competence and judgment.SB732,1914Section 19. Accy 2.403 of the administrative code is renumbered Accy 2.402 15(3) and amended to read:SB732,7,1916Accy 2.402 (3) An individual A candidate must have at least one year of public 17accounting the minimum work experience or its equivalent, as required under s. 18442.04 (5) (b) 3. a., b., or c., Stats., whichever is applicable with respect to the 19individual, as determined by the board.SB732,7,2220(4) Experience shall be acquired after the applicant has satisfied one of the 21requirements under s. Accy 2.303. This experience must have been acquired within 225 years prior to applying for the certification as a certified public accountant.SB732,2023Section 20. Accy 2.501 (2) (a) of the administrative code is amended to read:SB732,8,424Accy 2.501 (2) (a) An application for renewal on a form prescribed by the 1department that includes the applicant’s representation under penalties of perjury 2that, during the one-year 3-year period immediately preceding the date of 3application, the applicant has completed at least 120 continuing professional 4development credits meeting the requirements under s. Accy 2.602. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb732 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb732 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB732 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB732 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB732: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting